test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-5-itîw_gt-norm.yaml
      # 4Sg/Pl
      itîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: itimici # when another/others say thus to me, when another/others say thus about me
      itîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: itimiski # when another/others say thus to you, when another/others say thus about you
      itîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: itikoci # when another/others say thus to him/her, when another/others say thus about him/her
      itîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: itikoyâhki # when another/others say thus to us, when another/others say thus about us
      itîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: itikoyahki # when another/others say thus to you and us, when another/others say thus about you and us
      itîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: itikoyîko # when another/others say thus to you all, when another/others say thus about you all
      itîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: itikotwâwi # when another/others say thus to them, when another/others say thus about them
      itîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: itâthici # when another/others say thus to yet another/others, when another/others say thus about yet another/others

      # 5Sg/Pl
      itîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: itikothici # when yet another/others say thus to another/others, when yet another/others say thus about another/others

      # X
      itîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+1SgO: itikawiyâni # when someone says thus to me, when someone says thus about me
      itîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+2SgO: itikawiyani # when someone says thus to you, when someone says thus about you
      itîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+3SgO: itihci # when someone says thus to him/her, when someone says thus about him/her
      itîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+1PlO: itikawiyâhki # when someone says thus to us, when someone says thus about us
      itîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+12PlO: itikawiyahki # when someone says thus to you and us, when someone says thus about you and us
      itîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+2PlO: itikawiyîko # when someone says thus to you all, when someone says thus about you all
      itîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+3PlO: itihtwâwi # when someone says thus to them, when someone says thus about them
      itîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+4Sg/PlO: itimihci # when someone says thus to another/others, when someone says thus about another/others
      

      # Imp # Imm

      # 2Sg
      itîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: isin # (you) say thus to me now, (you) say thus about me now
      itîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1PlO: isinân # (you) say thus to us now, (you) say thus about us now
      itîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: isi # (you) say thus to him/her now, (you) say thus about him/her now
      itîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO: isik # (you) say thus to them now, (you) say thus about them now

      # 12Pl
      itîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO: itâtân # let you and us say thus to him/her now, let you and us say thus about him/her now
      itîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO: itâtânik # let you and us say thus to them now, let you and us say thus about them now

      # 2Pl
      itîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO: isik # (you all) say thus to me now, (you all) say thus about me now
      itîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1PlO: isinân # (you all) say thus to us now, (you all) say thus about us now
      itîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO: itihk # (you all) say thus to him/her now, (you all) say thus about him/her now
      itîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO: itihkwâw # (you all) say thus to them now, (you all) say thus about them now
      

      # Imp # Del

      # 2Sg
      itîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO: isîhkan # (you) say thus to me later, (you) say thus about me later
      itîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1PlO: isîhkâhk # (you) say thus to us later, (you) say thus about us later
      itîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: itâhkan # (you) say thus to him/her later, (you) say thus about him/her later
      itîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO: itâhkanik # (you) say thus to them later, (you) say thus about them later

      # 12Pl
      itîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO: itâhkahk # let you and us say thus to him/her later, let you and us say thus about him/her later
      itîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO: itâhkahkik # let you and us say thus to them later, let you and us say thus about them later
      itîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East: itâhkanik # let you and us say thus to them later, let you and us say thus about them later

      # 2Pl
      itîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO: isîhkîk # (you all) say thus to me later, (you all) say thus about me later
      itîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1PlO: isîhkâhk # (you all) say thus to us later, (you all) say thus about us later
      itîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: itâhkîk # (you all) say thus to him/her later, (you all) say thus about him/her later
      itîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO: itâhkîkwâw # (you all) say thus to them later, (you all) say thus about them later
      
